Washington statutes.
RCW 15.62.120

Certified copies of commission's proceedings, records, and acts—Admissible in court.

Copies of the proceedings, records, and acts of the commission, when certified by the secretary, shall be admissible in any court and be evidence of the truth of the statements therein contained.

[ 1989 c 5 s 11.]